Colorado, session 2026A, SB107.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-202, amend
(6)(b)(XVII) and (6)(b)(XVIII); and add (6)(b)(XIX) as follows:
24-72-202. Definitions.
As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:
(6) (b) "Public records" does not include:
(XVII) A complaint of harassment or discrimination, as described
in section 22-1-143, that is unsubstantiated and all records related to the
unsubstantiated complaint, including records of an investigation into the
-3- SB26-107

complaint; or
(XVIII) Jail assessments conducted pursuant to section 30-10-530
(5)(d) or 24-31-118; OR
(XIX) (A) A WRITTEN DOCUMENT OR ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT
IS PRODUCED BY A DEVICE OR APPLICATION THAT IS USED TO ASSIST AN
INDIVIDUAL WITH A DISABILITY TO FACILITATE COMMUNICATION IF THE
WRITTEN DOCUMENT OR ELECTRONIC RECORD HAS BEEN PRODUCED TO
FACILITATE COMMUNICATION FOR THE INDIVIDUAL WITH THE DISABILITY
IN LIEU OF VERBAL COMMUNICATION; OR
(B) A WRITTEN DOCUMENT OR ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT IS
PRODUCED BY A DEVICE OR APPLICATION THAT IS USED TO ASSIST
INDIVIDUALS WITH A LANGUAGE BARRIER TO FACILITATE COMMUNICATION
IF THE WRITTEN DOCUMENT OR ELECTRONIC RECORD HAS BEEN PRODUCED
TO FACILITATE COMMUNICATION BETWEEN THE INDIVIDUALS WITH A
LANGUAGE BARRIER IN LIEU OF VERBAL COMMUNICATION. AS USED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (6)(b)(XIX)(B), "LANGUAGE BARRIER" MEANS A DIFFICULTY
FOR INDIVIDUALS TO COMMUNICATE BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUALS SPEAK
DIFFERENT LANGUAGES OR DO NOT OTHERWISE SHARE A COMMON
LANGUAGE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-203, amend
(3)(b) introductory portion, (3)(b)(I), (3)(b)(II) introductory portion,
(3)(b)(II)(B), (3)(b)(III), (3)(d)(I), and (3)(d)(II); and add (1)(c),
(3)(b)(IV), (3)(e), and (3)(f) as follows:
24-72-203. Public records open to inspection - definitions.
(1) (c) A PUBLIC ENTITY THAT HAS PUBLIC RECORDS THAT MAY BE
SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE PURSUANT TO THIS PART 2 SHALL POST ON ITS
WEBSITE ANY RULES OR POLICIES ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
-4- SB26-107

PART 2, INCLUDING RULES CONCERNING THE INSPECTION OF PUBLIC
RECORDS. THE PUBLIC ENTITY SHALL ALSO POST ON ITS WEBSITE ANY
RECORDS RETENTION POLICY THAT IT HAS AND SHALL PROVIDE ON ITS
WEBSITE INFORMATION TO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC CONCERNING HOW TO
REQUEST INSPECTION OF PUBLIC RECORDS FROM A CUSTODIAN OF THE
PUBLIC RECORD. IF THE PUBLIC ENTITY DOES NOT HAVE A PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE, THEN THE INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE POSTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1)(c) MUST BE PHYSICALLY POSTED IN
THE LOCATION DESIGNATED BY THE PUBLIC ENTITY FOR POSTING NOTICES.
(3) (b) The date and hour set for the inspection of records not
readily available at the time of the request shall MUST be within a
reasonable time after the request. As used in this subsection (3), a
"reasonable time" shall be IS presumed to be three FIVE working days or
less. Such period may be extended if extenuating circumstances exist.
However, such period of extension shall not exceed seven TEN working
days. A finding that extenuating circumstances exist shall MUST be made
in writing by the custodian and shall MUST be provided to the person
making the request within the three-day FIVE-DAY period. Extenuating
circumstances shall apply only when:
(I) A broadly stated request is made that encompasses all or
substantially all of a large category of records and the request is without
sufficient specificity to allow the custodian reasonably to prepare or
gather the records within the three-day FIVE-DAY period; or
(II) A broadly stated request is made that encompasses all or
substantially all of a large category of records and the agency is unable to
prepare or gather the records within the three-day FIVE-DAY period
because:
-5- SB26-107

(B) In the case of the general assembly or its staff or service
agencies, the general assembly is in session; or
(III) A request involves such a large volume of records that the
custodian cannot reasonably prepare or gather the records within the
three-day FIVE-DAY period without substantially interfering with the
custodian's obligation to perform his or her THE CUSTODIAN'S other public
service responsibilities; OR
(IV) THE CUSTODIAN, OR A PERSON WHO IS ESSENTIAL TO THE
PROCESS OF RESPONDING TO REQUESTS, IS NOT SCHEDULED TO WORK
WITHIN ALL OR PART OF THE FIVE-DAY PERIOD.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the
public records requested are election-related and are in the custody and
control of a county clerk and recorder but are in active use, in storage, or
otherwise not readily available at the time a requester asks to examine
them, and the request is made during an election for which the county
clerk and recorder is the designated election official, the county clerk and
recorder may, at the county clerk and recorder's discretion, take additional
time to fulfill the request as specified in this subsection (3)(d); except that
the provisions of this subsection (3)(d) do not apply if the requester of the
public records is a mass medium organization as defined in section
13-90-119 (1)(a), or a newsperson, as defined in section 13-90-119 (1)(c).
The county clerk and recorder may take additional time to fulfill the
request as follows:
(I) During the period beginning on the sixtieth day before election
day and concluding with the date by which the county clerk and recorder
certifies the final official abstract of votes cast for the applicable election,
the county clerk and recorder may extend the period for production of
-6- SB26-107

records up to an additional ten working days past the seven-day TEN-DAY
extension allowed under subsection (3)(b) of this section;
(II) The county clerk and recorder shall provide written notice of
the extension to the requester within three FIVE working days from the
date of the request;
(e) (I) (A) IF A CUSTODIAN, DESPITE EXPENDING REASONABLE
EFFORT, IS UNABLE TO DETERMINE OR ACCESS PUBLIC RECORDS THAT MAY
BE RESPONSIVE TO A REQUEST BECAUSE THE PUBLIC RECORDS MAY BE IN
THE SOLE AND EXCLUSIVE CUSTODY AND CONTROL OF ANOTHER
EMPLOYEE, VOLUNTEER, DIRECTOR, AGENT, ELECTED OFFICIAL, OR OTHER
PERSON AUTHORIZED TO HAVE CUSTODY AND CONTROL OF THE PUBLIC
RECORDS WHO IS ON LEAVE, NOT ON CONTRACT, OR OTHERWISE NOT
SCHEDULED TO WORK WITHIN THE APPLICABLE RESPONSE PERIOD, THE
CUSTODIAN SHALL PROVIDE WITHIN THE APPLICABLE RESPONSE PERIOD
ALL OTHER AVAILABLE RESPONSIVE PUBLIC RECORDS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS PART 2. THE CUSTODIAN SHALL NOTIFY THE REQUESTER OF THE
EARLIEST DATE ON WHICH THE OTHER PERSON WHO MAY HAVE ANY
ADDITIONAL POTENTIALLY RESPONSIVE PUBLIC RECORDS IS EXPECTED TO
BE AVAILABLE, AND, IF THE PERSON'S RETURN DATE IS UNABLE TO BE
DETERMINED AT THE TIME OF THE REQUEST, THE CUSTODIAN SHALL
NOTIFY THE REQUESTER OF THE DATE OF THE PERSON'S RETURN AS SOON
AS IT IS ABLE TO BE DETERMINED OR, IF THE PERSON IS NOT EXPECTED TO
RETURN TO WORK, THE CUSTODIAN SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE
REQUESTER OF THAT. THE REQUESTER MAY SUBMIT A NEW REQUEST FOR
ANY ADDITIONAL POTENTIALLY RESPONSIVE PUBLIC RECORDS ON OR
AFTER THE DATE THAT THE CUSTODIAN PROVIDES.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(e) IS NOT INTENDED TO BE USED TO
-7- SB26-107

INTENTIONALLY DELAY OR CIRCUMVENT THE RELEASE OF PUBLIC RECORDS
AND DOES NOT EXEMPT A CUSTODIAN'S RESPONSIBILITY TO MAINTAIN
REASONABLE ACCESS TO PUBLIC RECORDS.
(II) THE PROVISIONS SET FORTH IN THIS SUBSECTION (3)(e) DO NOT
MODIFY THE PROVISIONS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS
SECTION.
(III) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3)(e), UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES, "APPLICABLE RESPONSE PERIOD" MEANS:
(A) THE FIVE-DAY PERIOD OR THE TEN-DAY EXTENSION SET FORTH
IN SUBSECTION (3)(b) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(B) THE PERIOD INCLUDING THE ADDITIONAL TEN-DAY PERIOD SET
FORTH IN SUBSECTION (3)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(f) (I) IF A CUSTODIAN DETERMINES THAT REQUESTED PUBLIC
RECORDS WILL BE USED FOR THE DIRECT SOLICITATION OF BUSINESS FOR
PECUNIARY GAIN, THE CUSTODIAN SHALL PROVIDE THE REQUESTER WITH
WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE DETERMINATION WITHIN THE FIVE-DAY PERIOD,
AND, NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, IN
SETTING A DATE AND HOUR FOR RECORDS TO BE AVAILABLE FOR
INSPECTION, THE CUSTODIAN SHALL HAVE THIRTY WORKING DAYS FROM
PROVIDING THE NOTICE. A REQUESTER MAY SUBMIT WITH A REQUEST A
SIGNED STATEMENT AFFIRMING THAT THE REQUESTED PUBLIC RECORDS
WILL NOT BE USED FOR THE DIRECT SOLICITATION OF BUSINESS FOR
PECUNIARY GAIN, WHICH THE CUSTODIAN MUST CONSIDER IN MAKING THE
CUSTODIAN'S DETERMINATION PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)(f)(I).
THE CUSTODIAN SHALL NOT CONSIDER IF THE REQUESTER MAY RECEIVE
ANY MONETARY OR EQUITABLE AWARD PURSUANT TO LITIGATION IN
MAKING THE DETERMINATION OF WHETHER A REQUEST IS FOR THE DIRECT
-8- SB26-107

SOLICITATION OF BUSINESS FOR PECUNIARY GAIN.
(II) A REQUESTER THAT MAKES A REQUEST THAT HAS BEEN
DETERMINED BY A CUSTODIAN TO BE FOR THE DIRECT SOLICITATION OF
BUSINESS FOR PECUNIARY GAIN MAY APPLY TO THE DISTRICT COURT OF
THE DISTRICT IN WHICH THE REQUESTED PUBLIC RECORDS ARE LOCATED
FOR A DETERMINATION THAT THE REQUEST IS NOT FOR THE DIRECT
SOLICITATION OF BUSINESS FOR PECUNIARY GAIN. THE COURT SHALL
REVIEW THE MATTER AT THE EARLIEST PRACTICAL TIME AND HAS
DISCRETION TO LIMIT ITS REVIEW TO SUBMISSION OF PLEADINGS,
AFFIDAVITS, AND OTHER MATERIAL AS DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE
COURT, OR THE COURT MAY SCHEDULE A HEARING. IN ITS REVIEW, THE
COURT SHALL APPLY AN ABUSE OF DISCRETION STANDARD TO THE
CUSTODIAN'S DETERMINATION.
(III) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-72-205 (6)(a), A CUSTODIAN
IS ENTITLED TO RECOVER THE REASONABLE COST ASSOCIATED WITH
DIRECTLY RESPONDING TO A REQUEST FOR RECORDS THAT HAS BEEN
DETERMINED BY THE CUSTODIAN TO BE FOR THE DIRECT SOLICITATION OF
BUSINESS FOR PECUNIARY GAIN.
(IV) A REQUEST FOR PUBLIC RECORDS FOR PURPOSES RELATED TO
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING, ORGANIZING, OR OTHER RIGHTS AND ACTIVITIES
PROTECTED BY ARTICLE 33 OF TITLE 29 BY AN ENTITY ENGAGED IN
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING, ORGANIZING, OR OTHER RIGHTS AND ACTIVITIES
PROTECTED BY ARTICLE 33 OF TITLE 29 IS NOT A REQUEST FOR THE DIRECT
SOLICITATION OF BUSINESS FOR PECUNIARY GAIN.
(V) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(f) DOES NOT APPLY TO A CONTRACT OR
OTHER INFORMATION DELIVERED USING COMPUTER DATA EXTRACTION
METHODS THAT REQUIRE MINIMAL HUMAN INTERVENTION FOR RETRIEVAL.
-9- SB26-107

SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-204, amend
(3)(a)(VI) as follows:
24-72-204. Allowance or denial of inspection - grounds -
procedure - appeal - definitions - repeal.
(3) (a) The custodian shall deny the right of inspection of the
following records, unless otherwise provided by law; except that the
custodian shall make any of the following records, other than letters of
reference concerning employment, licensing, or issuance of permits,
available to the person in interest in accordance with this subsection (3):
(VI) Except as provided in section 1-2-227, addresses and
telephone numbers of students in any public elementary or secondary
school AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION OF STUDENTS IN ANY PUBLIC
ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL THAT COULD BE USED BY A PERSON
TO DIRECTLY CONTACT, ADDRESS, OR SEND A MESSAGE TO THE STUDENT
THROUGH ANY MEANS OR METHOD;
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-205, amend
(6)(a) and (7); and add (6)(c), (6)(d), and (8) as follows:
24-72-205. Copy, printout, or photograph of a public record
- imposition of research and retrieval fee.
(6) (a) A custodian may impose a fee in response to a request for
the research and retrieval of public records only if the custodian has, prior
to the date of receiving the request, either posted on the custodian's
website or otherwise published a written policy that specifies the
applicable conditions concerning the research and retrieval of public
records by the custodian, including the amount of any current fee. Under
any such policy, the custodian shall not impose a charge for the first hour
of time expended in connection with the research and retrieval of public
-10- SB26-107

records. After the first hour of time has been expended, the custodian may
charge a fee for the research and retrieval of public records that shall not
exceed thirty dollars per hour. IF REQUESTED, A CUSTODIAN SHALL
PROVIDE A REASONABLE BREAKDOWN OF COSTS THAT COMPRISE THE FEE
CHARGED FOR THE RESEARCH AND RETRIEVAL OF PUBLIC RECORDS
AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (6)(a).
(c) FOR PURPOSES OF THE FEE CHARGED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (6), A CUSTODIAN MAY TREAT A REQUEST FOR PUBLIC
RECORDS MADE WITHIN FOURTEEN CALENDAR DAYS OF ANOTHER REQUEST
FOR INFORMATION PERTAINING TO FACIALLY SIMILAR CONTENT MADE BY
THE SAME PERSON AS ONE REQUEST AND NOT AS MULTIPLE INDIVIDUAL
REQUESTS.
(d) IN ADDITION TO THE FIRST HOUR IN WHICH A CUSTODIAN SHALL
NOT IMPOSE A CHARGE FOR THE TIME EXPENDED IN THE RESEARCH AND
RETRIEVAL OF PUBLIC RECORDS PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, A CUSTODIAN WHO FAILS TO RESPOND TO A REQUEST FOR
INSPECTION OF PUBLIC RECORDS WITHIN THE TIME PERIOD REQUIRED BY
SECTION 24-72-203 (3) SHALL ALSO PROVIDE THE REQUESTER WITH ONE
ADDITIONAL HOUR OF RESEARCH AND RETRIEVAL TIME WITHOUT CHARGE
FOR EACH CALENDAR DAY, OR PORTION THEREOF, THAT THE RESPONSE IS
LATE.
(7) If a custodian of a public record requested pursuant to this part
2 PUBLIC ENTITY allows members of the public to pay for any other
service or product provided by the custodian PUBLIC ENTITY with a credit
card or electronic payment, the PUBLIC ENTITY AND THE custodian OF THE
PUBLIC RECORD REQUESTED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 2 must allow the
requester of the public record to pay any fee or deposit associated with the
-11- SB26-107

request with a credit card or via an electronic payment. The custodian
may require a requester to pay any service charge or fee imposed by the
processor of a credit card or electronic payment.
(8) IF A CUSTODIAN IMPOSES ANY REQUIREMENTS CONCERNING
THE PREPAYMENT OF FEES OR THE PAYMENT OF FEES IN CONNECTION WITH
A REQUEST FOR INSPECTION OF PUBLIC RECORDS, THE REQUIREMENTS
MUST BE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE CUSTODIAN'S ADOPTED RULES OR
WRITTEN POLICIES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 2 AND MUST NOT BE
INCONSISTENT WITH THE PROVISIONS SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to requests for public records made pursuant
to article 72 of title 24, Colorado Revised Statutes, on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
-12- SB26-107